Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 24 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
§ 34-24-118.
Report of abandoned property.

A person holding property tangible or intangible, deemed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this act, shall report to the administrator concerning the property as provided in this section.

The report shall be verified and shall include:

Except with respect to traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property of the value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more deemed abandoned under this act;

In the case of unclaimed funds of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more held or owing under any insurance policy or annuity contract, the full name and last known address of the insured policy owner or annuitant and of the beneficiary according to the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds. The report shall also include any information required by W.S. 26-16-505(h);

In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or of other tangible property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and may be inspected by the administrator and any amounts owing to the holder;

The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due, but items of value under fifty dollars ($50.00) each may be reported in the aggregate;

The date the property became payable, demandable or returnable and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

Other information the administrator prescribes by rule as necessary for the administration of this act.

If the person holding property deemed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed a name while holding the property, the report filed shall contain all known names and addresses of each previous holder of the property.

The report shall be filed no later than November 1 of each year for the reporting period ending June 30 next preceding. On written request by any person required to file a report, the administrator may postpone the reporting date.

Not more than one hundred twenty (120) days before filing the report required by this section, the holder in possession of property deemed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under this act shall send written notice to the apparent owner at that owner’s last known address informing the owner that the holder is in possession of property subject to this act if:

The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner which the holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate;

The claim of the apparent owner is not barred by the statute of limitations; and

The property has a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more.

Reports filed with the administrator under this section are not public records and are not open to public inspection until twenty-four (24) months after the date payment or delivery is made under W.S.

34-24-120

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1994, ch. 101, § 2; 2019 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii) added the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a), (b) and (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-119.
Abandoned property lists; notice and publication of lists of abandoned property.

The administrator shall prepare two (2) lists with information about property paid or delivered to the administrator under W.S.

34-24-120

:

One [(1)] list shall refer to all unclaimed funds of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more in the administrator’s custody and shall contain:

The name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ report to be entitled to the property; and

The name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant and beneficiary from the report of an insurance company.

The second list shall refer to property that has been in the administrator’s custody for more than twenty-four (24) months and shall contain the following information:

The name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ report to be entitled to the property and the name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant and beneficiary from the report of an insurance company;

The amount paid or delivered to the administrator;

The name of the person who paid or delivered the property to the administrator;

A general description of the property; and

Other information the administrator deems appropriate for inclusion in the list.

The lists described in subsection (a) of this section shall be updated semiannually and shall be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours. Copies of each list shall be available to the public for a fee to be set by the administrator.

Within the calendar year following the year in which unclaimed property has been paid or delivered to the administrator, the administrator shall advertise the unclaimed property in a form that, in the discretion of the administrator, is likely to attract the attention of the apparent owner of the unclaimed property.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 57 § 2.

The administrator shall not be required to advertise the name and address or location of an owner of abandoned property having a total value less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor information concerning traveler’s checks, money orders and other similar written instruments deemed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-105

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 2015 ch. 57, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in present (c), substituted “in a form that” for “one (1) time in a newspaper
generally circulating in this state.
The advertisement shall be made in such form as”; and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The advertisement shall contain the following information”; repealed former (c)(i) through (c)(iv), pertaining to content of advertising notices; and made related changes.

§ 34-24-120.
Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

At the time of the filing of the report required by W.S.

34-24-118

and with that report, the person holding property deemed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property shall pay or deliver to the administrator all of the property shown on the report and remaining unclaimed by the apparent owner. Upon written request showing good cause, the administrator may postpone the payment or delivery upon such terms or conditions as the administrator deems necessary and appropriate. The property paid or delivered to the administrator shall include all interest, dividends, increments and accretions due, payable or distributable on the property on November 1 of the year in which the report is required, except that interest accrued on a policy as defined in W.S. 26-16-505(k)(iii) or a retained asset account as defined in W.S. 26-16-505(k)(v) shall not be considered unclaimed property. If payment or delivery is postponed, the property paid or delivered to the administrator shall include all interest, dividends, increments and accretions due, payable or distributable on the day that the property is paid or delivered to the administrator.

The holder of an interest under W.S.

34-24-111

shall issue and deliver to the administrator a duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership, registered in the name of the Wyoming state treasurer. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the administrator, the holder and any transfer agent, registrar or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership is relieved of all liability in accordance with W.S.

34-24-121

to every person, including any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate certificate issued to the administrator, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the issuance and delivery of the duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership to the administrator.

When a certificate or other evidence of ownership, or a bond or other debt security, registered in the name of a person is delivered to the administrator pursuant to any provision of this act and is presented by the administrator to the issuer thereof of [or] its agent, the issuer shall transfer and register it in the name of the Wyoming state treasurer, and a new certificate or security, so registered, shall be delivered to the administrator. The issuer and its transfer agent, registrar or other person acting on behalf of the issuer in executing and delivering the certificate or security shall be fully and automatically relieved from any liability to any person in accordance with W.S.

34-24-121

for any loss or damage caused by the transfer, issuance and delivery of the certificate or security to the administrator.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1994, ch. 101, § 2; 2019 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "except that interest accrued on a policy as defined in W.S. 26-16-505(k)(iii) or a retained asset account as defined in W.S. 26-16-505(k)(v) shall not be considered unclaimed property" to the end of the third sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (c), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-121.
Custody by state; holder relieved from liability; reimbursement of holder paying claim; reclaiming for owner; defense of holder; payment of safe deposit box or repository charges.

Upon the payment or delivery of property to the administrator, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A person who pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any claim then existing or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property. The person who pays or delivers in this manner shall not thereafter be liable for interest.

A holder who has paid money to the administrator pursuant to this act may make payment to any person appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment and, upon filing proof of payment and proof that the payee was entitled thereto, the administrator shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing any fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler’s check or money order, the holder must be reimbursed under this subsection upon filing proof that the instrument was duly presented and that payment was made to a person who appeared to the holder to be entitled to payment. The holder shall be reimbursed for payment made under this subsection even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was barred under W.S. 34-24-130(a).

A holder who has delivered property (including a certificate of any interest in a business association) other than money to the administrator pursuant to this act may reclaim the property if still in the possession of the administrator, without paying any fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the owner has claimed the property from the holder.

The administrator may accept the holder’s affidavit as sufficient proof of the facts that entitle the holder to recover money and property under this section.

If the holder pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith and thereafter another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the administrator, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any liability on the claim.

For the purposes of this section, “good faith” means that:

Payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with this act;

The person delivering the property was not a fiduciary then in breach of trust in respect to the property and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known to that person, that the property was abandoned for the purposes of this act; and

There is no showing that the records pursuant to which the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice in the industry.

Property removed from a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository is received by the administrator subject to the holder’s right under this subsection to be reimbursed for the actual cost of the opening and to any valid lien or contract providing for the holder to be reimbursed for unpaid rent, storage, or any other charges that are reasonable and related.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-122.
Amount recoverable by owner.

Whenever property is paid or delivered to the administrator under this act, the owner is entitled to receive from the administrator the principal amount turned over to the state.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-123.
Public sale of abandoned property.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the administrator, within three (3) years after the receipt of abandoned property, shall sell it to the highest bidder at public sale in whatever city in the state affords in the judgment of the administrator the most favorable market for the property involved. The administrator may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if in the judgment of the administrator the bid is insufficient. If in the judgment of the administrator the probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property, it need not be offered for sale. Any sale held under this section shall be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three (3) weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold.

Securities listed on an established stock exchange shall be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the administrator considers advisable.

Unless the administrator considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, all securities, other than those deemed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-111

, delivered to the administrator shall be held for at least one (1) year before he may sell them.

Unless the administrator considers it to be in the best interest of the state to do otherwise, all securities deemed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-111

and delivered to the administrator shall be held for at least three (3) years before the administrator may sell them. If the administrator sells any securities delivered pursuant to W.S.

34-24-111

before the expiration of the three (3) year period, any person making a claim pursuant to this act before the end of the three (3) year period is entitled to either the proceeds of the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the time the claim is made, whichever amount is greater. A person making a claim under this act after the expiration of this period is entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the administrator by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of the administrator, or the proceeds received from sale, but no person has any claim under this act against the state, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to the administrator.

The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the administrator pursuant to this act takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or under them. The administrator shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (d) and (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-124.
Deposit of funds; investment of funds; loans; immunity from liability.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, the administrator shall promptly deposit in the unclaimed property account all funds received under this act, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under W.S.

34-24-123

. Before making the deposit, the administrator shall record the name and last known address of each person appearing from the holders’ reports to be entitled to the property and the name and last known address of each insured person or annuitant and beneficiary and with respect to each policy or contract listed in the report of an insurance company its number, the name of the company and the amount due. The claimant’s name and last known address shall be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

The administrator or his designee shall invest the funds in the unclaimed property account created by subsection (a) of this section as authorized by law in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the purposes of this act. Investment earnings from the account shall be deposited into the unclaimed property investment earnings account. There is continuously appropriated to the administrator from the unclaimed property investment earnings account an amount equal to the administrator’s expenses in carrying out this act. Annually after the end of each fiscal year the administrator shall deposit in the general fund investment earnings earned on the unclaimed property account which exceed the amount necessary to administer this act for the fiscal year and which exceeds the amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the immediately prior biennium’s appropriation for the unclaimed property division.

An action or proceeding shall not be commenced against the state, the administrator or his designee because of an act of the administrator under this section or under W.S. 9-4-715(p)(viii) involving the investment of unclaimed property funds.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2020 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund,” “another separate account” for “an account within the enterprise fund,” and “interest account” for “enterprise fund account.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the section.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "net" following "highest" in the first sentence of (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first and third sentences, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 34-24-125.
Filing of claim with administrator.

A person, excluding another state, claiming an interest in any property paid or delivered to the administrator may file with the administrator a claim on a form prescribed by the administrator and verified by the claimant.

The administrator shall consider each claim within ninety (90) days after it is filed and give written notice to the claimant if the claim is denied in whole or in part. The notice may be given by mailing it to the last address, if any, stated in the claim as the address to which notices are to be sent. If no address for notices is stated in the claim, the notice may be mailed to the last address, if any, of the claimant as stated in the claim. No notice of denial need be given if the claim fails to state either the last address to which notices are to be sent or the address of the claimant.

If a claim is allowed, the administrator shall pay over to the claimant the monies received from the holder, or the net proceeds if property has been sold by the administrator, together with any additional amount required by W.S.

34-24-122

. If the claim is for property deemed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-111

which was sold by the administrator within three (3) years after the date of delivery, the amount payable for that claim is the value of the property at the time the claim was made or the net proceeds of sale, whichever is greater.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 7, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-5-203(f) or any provision of this act, all funds which have previously been paid over to the state and which, pursuant to W.S. 9-5-203(d), are held by the state treasurer in an account within the trust and agency fund on the effective date of this act, shall be subject to escheat under W.S. 9-5-203(a) through (e).”

§ 34-24-126.
Claim of another state to recover property; procedure.

At any time after property has been paid or delivered to the administrator under this act another state may recover the property if:

The property was subjected to custody by this state because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner when the property was deemed abandoned under this act, and the other state establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in that state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

The property was subjected to custody by this state under W.S. 34-24-104(a)(vi) and under the laws of the state of domicile of the holder the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; or

The property is the sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order or other similar instrument that was subjected to custody by this state under W.S.

34-24-105

, and the instrument was purchased in the other state and under the laws of that state the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of abandonment by that state.

The claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, who shall decide the claim within ninety (90) days after it is presented. The administrator shall allow the claim if he determines that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (a) of this section.

The administrator shall require a state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim for the property.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in subsection (a)(i), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 7, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-5-203(f) or any provision of this act, all funds which have previously been paid over to the state and which, pursuant to W.S. 9-5-203(d), are held by the state treasurer in an account within the trust and agency fund on the effective date of this act, shall be subject to escheat under W.S. 9-5-203(a) through (e).”

§ 34-24-127.
Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a decision of the administrator or whose claim has not been acted upon within ninety (90) days after its filing may bring an action to establish the claim in the district court of the county where the claimant resides or in the district court of Laramie county, naming the administrator as a defendant. The action shall be brought within ninety (90) days after the decision of the administrator or within one hundred eighty (180) days after the filing of the claim if he has failed to act on it.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-128.
Delivery prior to abandonment.

A holder, with the written consent of the administrator and upon conditions and terms prescribed by him, may report and deliver property before the property is deemed abandoned. Property delivered under this subsection shall be held by the administrator and is not deemed abandoned until such time as it otherwise would be deemed abandoned under this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-129.
Destruction or disposition of property having insubstantial commercial value; immunity from liability.

If the administrator determines after investigation that any property delivered under this act has insubstantial commercial value, the administrator may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property after five (5) years in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the administrator. No action or proceeding may be maintained against the state or any officer or against the holder for or on account of any action taken by the administrator pursuant to this section. The administrator shall keep a public record of all such property, identifying the property and the date and nature of the disposition.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-130.
Periods of limitation.

The expiration, before or after the effective date of this act, of any period of time specified by contract, statute or court order, during which a claim for money or property can be made or during which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being deemed abandoned or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or deliver abandoned property to the administrator as required by this act.

No action or proceeding may be commenced by the administrator against any holder concerning any provision of this act more than ten (10) years after the holder either specifically reported the property, or gave notice of a dispute regarding the property, to the administrator.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-131.
Examination of records.

If an examination of the records of a person results in the disclosure of property reportable and deliverable under this act, the administrator may assess the cost of the examination against the holder at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100.00) a day for each examiner, but in no case may the charges exceed the value of the property found to be reportable and deliverable. The cost of examination may be imposed only against a business association.

If a holder fails after the effective date of this act to maintain the records required by W.S.

34-24-132

and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this act are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the administrator may require the holder to report and pay such amounts as may reasonably be estimated from any available records.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a) and in subsection (b), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-132.
Retention of records.

Every holder required to file a report under W.S.

34-24-118

, as to any property for which it has obtained the last known address of the owner, shall maintain a record of the name and last known address of the owner for five (5) years after the property becomes reportable, except to the extent that a shorter time is provided in subsection (b) of this section or by rule of the administrator.

Any business association that sells in this state its traveler’s checks, money orders or other similar written instruments, other than third-party bank checks on which the business association is directly liable, or that provides such instruments to others for sale in this state, shall maintain a record of those instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue for three (3) years after the date the property is reportable.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-133.
Enforcement.

The administrator, for and on behalf of this state, may commence an action, summary or otherwise, in the district court of the county where the defendant resides or in the district court of Laramie county:

For an adjudication that certain property is unclaimed and payable or distributable to the administrator;

To compel presentation of a report or payment or distribution of property to the administrator;

To enforce the duty of a person to permit the examination or audit of the records of that person;

To enjoin any act that violates the public policy or provisions of this act; or

To enforce any aspect of this act in any manner.

The administrator may commence an action under subsection (a) of this section in the following situations:

The holder is a person domiciled in this state or is a governmental entity of this state;

The holder is a person engaged in or transacting any business in this state, although not domiciled in this state; or

The subject matter is tangible personal property held in this state.

In a situation where no state court in this state can obtain jurisdiction over the person involved, the administrator may commence an action authorized by this section in a federal court or state court of another state having jurisdiction over that person.

The administrator shall be an indispensable party to any judicial or administrative proceedings concerning the disposition and handling of unclaimed property that is or may be payable or distributable into the protective custody of the administrator.

The administrator shall have a right to intervene and participate in any judicial or administrative proceeding when to do so will be in the best interest of this state, the apparent owner or the unclaimed property or to conserve and safeguard the unclaimed property against dissipation, undue diminishment or adverse discriminatory treatment.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a)(iv) and (a)(v), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-134.
Interstate agreements and cooperation; joint and reciprocal actions with other states.

The administrator may enter into agreements with other states to exchange information needed to enable this or another state to audit or otherwise determine unclaimed property that it or another state may be entitled to subject to a claim of custody. The administrator by rule may require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with agreements made pursuant to this section and prescribe the form.

To avoid conflicts between the administrator’s procedures and the procedures of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, the administrator, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies and provisions of this act, before adopting, amending or repealing rules, shall advise and consult with administrators in other jurisdictions that enact substantially the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act and take into consideration the rules of administrators in other jurisdictions that enact the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.

The administrator may join with other states to seek enforcement of this act against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under this act.

At the request of another state, the attorney general of this state may bring an action in the name of the administrator of the other state in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder in this state of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the attorney general in bringing the action.

The administrator may request that the attorney general of another state or any other person bring an action in the name of the administrator in the other state. This state shall pay all expenses including attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection. The administrator may agree to pay the person bringing the action attorney’s fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any property recovered in the action. Any expenses paid pursuant to this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (b), (c) and (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-135.
Interest and penalties.

Unless specifically exempted by federal law:

A person who willfully fails to present a report to the administrator when due or to perform any other duty required under this act, other than payment or delivery of unclaimed property as required by this act, shall pay a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day the report is not presented or the duty is not performed;

A person who willfully fails to pay or deliver to the administrator any unclaimed property as required under this act shall pay a civil penalty equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of the property that should have been paid or delivered;

Any person who fails to pay or deliver unclaimed property to the administrator within the time period required by this act shall pay to the administrator interest at the annual rate of ten percent (10%) above the annual rate of discount, in effect on the date the property should have been paid or delivered, for the most recent issue of 52-week U.S. treasury bills, calculated upon the value of the unclaimed property from the date that property should have been paid or delivered. If the property remains unpaid or undelivered for more than one (1) year after becoming payable or deliverable, the interest rate for each succeeding year shall be calculated at an annual rate of ten percent (10%) above the discount rate on each succeeding anniversary of the date that the unclaimed property was payable or distributable.

For the purposes of assessing and calculating the penalties and interest on unclaimed property which was discovered during an examination or audit and which was not paid or distributed, as required, the date upon which the unclaimed property was originally payable or distributable shall be used as the date upon or from which penalties and interest are assessed and calculated.

The administrator shall have discretion to waive the payment of penalties and interest or to reduce the amount of the interest in an appropriate circumstance.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a)(i) and (a)(ii) and in the first sentence in subsection (a)(iii), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-136.
Agreements to locate property.

All agreements from claimants to pay compensation to a third-party researcher to recover or assist in the recovery of property reported under W.S.

34-24-118

, made within twenty-four (24) months after the date payment or delivery is made from the holder to the state of Wyoming under W.S.

34-24-120

, are unenforceable.

An agreement entered into after the twenty-four (24) month period provided by subsection (a) of this section is enforceable only if the agreement is in writing.

An agreement by a claimant to pay compensation to a third-party researcher to recover or assist in the recovery of property in the possession of a holder is unenforceable if made within twelve (12) months prior to the scheduled date for the holder to report the property under W.S.

34-24-118

, whether or not the property remains in the holder’s possession until that reporting date.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1994, ch. 101, § 2.

§ 34-24-137.
Foreign transactions.

This act does not apply to any property held, due and owing in a foreign country and arising out of a foreign transaction.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-138.
Effect of new provisions; clarification of application.

This act does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before the effective date of this act to report, pay or deliver property. A holder who did not comply with the law in effect before the effective date of this act is subject to the applicable enforcement and penalty provisions that then existed and they are continued in effect for the purpose of this subsection, subject to W.S. 34-24-130(b).

The initial report filed under this act for property that was not required to be reported before the effective date of this act but which is subject to this act shall include all items of property that are deemed abandoned as of the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-139.
Rules.

The administrator may adopt necessary rules to carry out the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).